Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20266-101
Title.

Sections 6-101 to 6-126 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Assignment for Benefit of Creditors Act.

Laws 2026, LB783, § 1.
July 18, 2026